Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.220

Hospitalization, surgery, etc.

Whenever any participant becomes injured, disabled, or sick in consequence or as the result of the performance of his or her duties by reason of which he or she is confined to any hospital or other medical facility, an amount not exceeding the daily ward rate of the hospital or regular fees for such service shall be allowed and paid from the principal fund. This allowance shall not be in lieu of but in addition to any other allowance provided in this chapter. In addition, the costs of surgery, medicine, laboratory fees, X-ray, special therapies, and similar additional costs shall be paid. When extended treatment, not available in the injured, disabled, or sick participant's home area, is required, the participant may be reimbursed for actual mileage to and from the place of extended treatment pursuant to RCW 43.03.060.

[ 1999 c 148 s 20; 1989 c 91 s 19; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 76 s 4; 1965 c 86 s 3; 1961 c 57 s 5; 1957 c 159 s 4; 1953 c 253 s 7; 1951 c 103 s 3; 1949 c 145 s 2; 1945 c 261 s 22; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9578-36. Prior: 1935 c 121 s 5; RRS s 9578-5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 91: See note following RCW 41.24.010.